Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Voluntary Dissolution

§ 17-16-1401.
Dissolution by incorporators or initial directors.

A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date of its incorporation;

Either:

That none of the corporation’s shares has been issued; or

That the corporation has not commenced business.

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were issued; and

That a majority of the incorporators or initial directors authorized the dissolution.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

§ 17-16-1402.
Dissolution by board of directors and shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders.

For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:

The board of directors shall recommend dissolution to the shareholders, unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders; and

The shareholders entitled to vote shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting in accordance with W.S.

17-16-705

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors, acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, adoption of the proposal to dissolve shall require the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast exists.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to action without meeting, see §

17-16-704

.

As to waiver of notice, see §

17-16-706

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “adoption of the proposal to dissolve shall require the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast exists” for “the proposal to dissolve to be adopted shall be approved by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on that proposal” in (e).

§ 17-16-1403.
Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date dissolution was authorized;

If dissolution was approved by the shareholders a statement that the proposal to dissolve was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this act and by the articles of incorporation.

A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

For purposes of this article, “dissolved corporation” means a corporation whose articles of dissolution have become effective and includes a successor entity to which the remaining assets of the corporation are transferred subject to its liabilities for purposes of liquidation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a)(iii), which read: “(iii) If dissolution was approved by the shareholders:

“(A) The number of votes entitled to be cast on the proposal to dissolve; and

“(B) Either the total number of votes cast for and against dissolution or the total number of undisputed votes cast for dissolution and a statement that the number cast for dissolution was sufficient for approval.”; repealed former (a)(iv), which read: “If voting by voting groups was required, the information required by paragraph (iii) of this subsection shall be separately provided for each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan to dissolve.”; and added (c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution, 20 ALR4th 414.

§ 17-16-1404.
Revocation of dissolution.

A corporation may revoke its dissolution within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of the dissolution.

Revocation of dissolution shall be authorized in the same manner as the dissolution was authorized unless that authorization permitted revocation by action of the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without shareholder action.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

The name of the corporation which shall satisfy the requirements of W.S.

17-16-401

;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the corporation’s board of directors or incorporators revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

If the corporation’s board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the shareholders, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If shareholder action was required to revoke the dissolution, the information required by W.S. 17-16-1403(a)(iii).

Revocation of dissolution is effective upon the effective date of the articles of revocation of dissolution.

When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as if the effective date of the dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred, except the corporation may be required to adopt some other name by amending its articles of incorporation in the manner provided by this act so its name satisfies the requirements of W.S.

17-16-401

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and (iv)” at the end of (c)(vi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-1405.
Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation does not:

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation’s share transfer records;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in article 8;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Quoted in

Trefren Constr. Co. v. V&R Constr., LLC, 2016 WY 121, 386 P.3d 317,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2016).

Enforcement of contracts. —

The right to enforce company's contracts is not impaired by the fact that a long time must necessarily pass before the contracts can be enforced. Wyoming-Indiana Oil & Gas Co. v. Weston, 43 Wyo. 526, 7 P.2d 206,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1932).

Standing to sue. —

In general contractor's action against subcontractor alleging defective work on a residence, motion to dismiss was improperly granted because the general contractor's Chapter 7 bankruptcy did not dissolve it; therefore, it had standing to sue as a corporation, and even if it was dissolved, it could have maintained a suit under this section.
Catamount Constr. v. Timmis Enters., 2008 WY 122, 193 P.3d 1153,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Estoppel of one selling or conveying property to dissolved or defunct corporation to deny its existence, 20 ALR2d 1084.

Maintainability of criminal proceedings against dissolved corporation, 40 ALR2d 1396.

Power of dissolved corporation to participate in arbitration proceedings, 71 ALR2d 1121.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution, 20 ALR4th 414.

§ 17-16-1406.
Known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by notifying its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date.

The written notice shall:

Describe information that shall be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred twenty (120) days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation shall receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation is barred:

If a claimant who was given written notice under subsection (b) of this section does not deliver the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline; or

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety (90) days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim that is not barred by this section may be enforced in accordance with W.S. 17-16-1407(d).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “notifying its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date” for “following the procedure described in this section” in (a); deleted the former first sentence of the introductory language of (b), which read: “The dissolved corporation shall notify its known claimants in writing, by mail or private carrier or by personal delivery, of the dissolution at any time after its effective date.”; and added (e).

§ 17-16-1407.
Other claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is or was last located;

Describe the information that shall be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within three (3) years or the applicable statute of limitations, whichever is less, after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within three (3) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under W.S.

17-16-1406

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on; or

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim that is not barred by W.S. 17-16-1406(c) or subsection (c) of this section may be enforced:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

Except as provided in W.S. 17-16-1408(d), if the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation to the extent of his pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to him in liquidation, whichever is less, but a shareholder’s total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the shareholder.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “three (3) years” for “four (4) years” in (b)(iii), and in (c); rewrote the introductory language of (d), which read: “A claim may be enforced under this section”; and in (d)(ii), added “Except as provided in W.S. 17-16-1408(d),” and substituted “the shareholder” for “him” at the end.

§ 17-16-1408.
Court proceedings.

A dissolved corporation that has published a notice under W.S.

17-16-1407

may file an application with the district court of the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office is located for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent or have not been made known to the dissolved corporation or that are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but that, based on the facts known to the dissolved corporation, are reasonably estimated to arise after the effective date of dissolution. Provision need not be made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under W.S.

17-16-1407

(c).

Within ten (10) days after the filing of the application, notice of the proceeding shall be given by the dissolved corporation to each claimant holding a contingent claim whose contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved corporation.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved corporation.

Provision by the dissolved corporation for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection (a) of this section shall satisfy the dissolved corporation’s obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the dissolved corporation or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and such claims may not be enforced against a shareholder who received assets in liquidation.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 17-16-1409.
Directors' duties.

Directors shall cause the dissolved corporation to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment of claims and make distributions of assets to shareholders after payment or provision for claims.

Directors of a dissolved corporation which has disposed of claims under W.S.

17-16-1406

,

17-16-1407

or

17-16-1408

shall not be liable for breach of this section with respect to claims against the dissolved corporation.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.